Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 5 Benefits

47-25-80.
Requirements for receiving benefits.

In order for a member to be eligible to receive retirement benefits under this chapter, he or she must have:

Served as a regularly qualified and commissioned chief magistrate or as the secretary-treasurer for at least eight years;

Fully complied with this chapter;

Terminated his or her official capacity as a chief magistrate or as the secretary-treasurer;

Attained the age of 60 years;

Filed with the board his or her application for such retirement, on a form to be furnished by the board, within a period of 90 days, or as soon thereafter as possible, after reaching the age of 60 years or after termination of his or her official capacity as a chief magistrate or as the secretary-treasurer, whichever may occur last in point of time; and

Had his or her application for retirement approved by the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-80

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 246, § 1/SB 244; Ga. L. 2014, p. 835, § 5/HB 646.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, deleted “full-time” preceding “chief magistrate” in paragraphs (1), (3), and (5).

47-25-81.
Amount of benefit.

Any member who is approved for retirement benefits as provided in Code Section 47-25-80 shall be paid a monthly sum equal to 4 percent of his or her average final monthly compensation for each year served by the member up to, but not exceeding, a total of 20 years; provided, however, that the final annual compensation used for calculating a benefit under this Code section shall not exceed $42,781.22 or the amount fixed in the following schedule according to county population, whichever amount is higher:

Click to view

The board of commissioners is authorized to adopt from time to time a method or methods of providing for increases in the maximum final monthly compensation used for calculating a benefit as provided in this Code section. Such method or methods shall be based upon:

The recommendation of the actuary of the board of commissioners;

The maintenance of the actuarial soundness of the fund in accordance with the standards provided in Code Section 47-20-10 or such higher standards as may be adopted by the board; and

Such other factors as the board deems relevant; provided, however, that any such increase shall be uniform and shall apply equally to all members of this retirement system.

No time for which dues have not been paid in accordance with Code Section 47-25-41 shall be considered in determining the number of years of service.

Population Maximum Average Final Monthly Compensation 500,000 or more $ 7,247.87 400,000 — 499,999 6,975.70 300,000 — 399,999 6,703.53 250,000 — 299,999 6,072.65 200,000 — 249,999 5,594.17 150,000 — 199,999 5,132.49 100,000 — 149,999 4,797.70 75,000 — 99,999 4,490.76 50,000 — 74,999 4,183.47 39,000 — 49,999 3,732.53 29,000 — 38,999 3,512.80 20,000 — 28,999 3,293.34 11,890 — 19,999 3,073.88 6,000 — 11,889 2,713.53 0 — 5,999 1,975.98

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-81

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 246, § 1/SB 244; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 66/SB 436; Ga. L. 2014, p. 701, § 4/HB 292.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “board of commissioners” for “board of trustees” in the first sentence of the introductory paragraph and at the end of paragraph (1).

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, designated the existing provisions of the first paragraph of this Code section as subsections (a) and (b); in subsection (a), substituted “$42,781.22 or the amount fixed in the following schedule according to county population, whichever amount is higher” for “$33,772.20; provided, further, that the”, and added the population table.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

47-25-82.
Benefits for surviving spouse.

As used in this Code section, the term “surviving spouse” means the person who was married to a member on the date of the member’s death.

Upon the death of any member who is then receiving retirement benefits and upon the surviving spouse of such member attaining 60 years of age, said spouse shall be paid spouse’s benefits which shall be equal to 50 percent of the retirement benefits then being paid to such member. Such benefits shall be paid for the remainder of the life of such surviving spouse.

Upon the death of any member prior to retirement, the surviving spouse of such member may elect:

To withdraw the dues paid into the retirement fund by the deceased member plus interest at the rate specified by law, in which case the spouse shall be deemed to have waived any right to any benefits; or

To leave such dues in the retirement fund and to receive spouse’s benefits which shall be payable beginning:

On the date of the member’s death, if such member is 60 years of age or older; or

On the date on which the surviving spouse of the deceased member reaches 60 years of age,

whichever event occurs last, and which shall be equal to 50 percent of the retirement benefits which the deceased member was drawing at the time of death or, in the case of a member who dies prior to his or her sixtieth birthday, which such deceased member would have been entitled to receive upon reaching 60 years of age had he or she lived and ceased service as a chief magistrate or the secretary-treasurer on the date of his or her death.

A member who is unmarried at the time of such election may designate a survivor at the time of making such election. If a member is married at the time of such election, the member may elect a designated survivor other than his or her spouse under this subsection only with the written agreement of the spouse. In any event, the designated survivor shall be a person with whom the member has a familial relationship through blood, marriage, or adoption. The designated survivor designated pursuant to this subsection shall be entitled to a survivor’s benefit which is the actuarial equivalent to a surviving spouse’s benefit as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-82

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 246, § 1/SB 244; Ga. L. 2014, p. 835, § 6/HB 646.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, deleted “full-time” preceding “chief magistrate” near the end of the ending undesignated paragraph in paragraph (c)(2).

47-25-82.1.
Designation of beneficiaries; determining amount of benefit; designated survivor requirements; death of beneficiary prior to member’s death.

In lieu of receiving the retirement benefits provided for in Code Sections 47-25-81 and 47-25-82, upon application for retirement, a member may elect in writing on a form to be prescribed by the board to receive:

A 100 percent joint life annuity payable during the lives of a member and his or her designated survivor; or

A joint and survivor annuity that shall provide for 50 percent of the monthly retirement benefit amount that is paid to the member to be paid to his or her designated survivor following such member’s death.

The amount of the retirement benefit payable under this Code section shall be:

Based on the member’s age upon retirement;

Based on the age of the member’s designated survivor upon the member’s retirement; and

Computed so as to be actuarially equivalent to the total retirement benefit amount which would have been paid to the member under Code Sections 47-25-81 and 47-25-82. Such actuarial equivalent shall be computed on actuarial tables to be adopted by the board.

A designated survivor shall be a person with whom the member has a familial relationship through blood, marriage, or adoption.

If a member is married at the time of such election, his or her spouse shall be the designated survivor unless another person is so designated with the written agreement of such spouse.

If a member makes an election provided in subsection (a) of this Code section in his or her application for retirement, after approval of the application for retirement, the following provisions shall apply:

If a member’s designated survivor predeceases such member, he or she may, in writing on forms prescribed by the board and subject to approval by the board, revoke such election and thereafter receive during the member’s lifetime a monthly retirement benefit commencing on the date the board approves such revocation, but not for any period prior to such approval.

Such monthly retirement benefit amount shall be equal to the maximum monthly benefit which would have been payable to such member had he or she not made such election.

If there is entered a final judgment of divorce between a member and a designated survivor, such member may, in writing on forms prescribed by the board and subject to approval by the board, revoke such election and thereafter receive during the member’s lifetime a monthly retirement benefit commencing on the date the board approves such revocation, but not for any period prior to such approval.

Such monthly retirement benefit amount shall be equal to the maximum monthly benefit which would have been payable to such member had he or she not made such election.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-82.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 196, § 2/HB 571.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2018.

47-25-83.
Refund of dues.

Any member, after ceasing to serve as a chief magistrate or as the secretary-treasurer and after waiving any right to retirement benefits in writing on a form to be provided by the board, may apply for and be refunded all dues paid, together with 5 percent simple interest per annum from the end of the calendar year in which paid to the end of the calendar year next preceding the application for the refund.

Although retirement pay shall be based on Code Section 47-25-81 and nothing in this Code section shall be construed to alter same, at the effective date of retirement, simple interest at a rate of 5 percent per annum shall be computed on all dues paid from the end of the calendar year in which paid to the end of the calendar year immediately preceding the date of retirement and shall be added to the total dues paid. After all retirement benefits coming due under Code Section 47-25-81 have been paid and if the total thereof shall not be equal to or exceed the above total of dues and interest, then the balance of such principal and interest shall be paid to the estate of the deceased member.

Upon application by the estate of any member who dies prior to retirement and who does not have a surviving spouse who is eligible for benefits under Code Section 47-25-82, all dues paid by such deceased member, together with 5 percent simple interest per annum from the end of the calendar year in which paid to the end of the calendar year next preceding the application for the refund, shall be paid to the estate of the deceased member.

No dues may be refunded except in strict compliance with this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-83

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 246, § 1/SB 244; Ga. L. 2014, p. 835, § 7/HB 646.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, deleted “full-time” preceding “chief magistrate” near the beginning of subsection (a).

47-25-84.
Total and permanent disability.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, a member may retire after completing four years of creditable service if he or she becomes totally and permanently disabled after commencing service as a chief magistrate or as the secretary-treasurer. Any such member shall be entitled to receive retirement benefits in the amount that he or she would receive if his or her retirement were effective at the time he or she became disabled. All questions relating to the degree and nature of the total and permanent disability suffered by the member shall be determined by the board.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-84

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 246, § 1/SB 244; Ga. L. 2014, p. 835, § 8/HB 646.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, deleted “full-time” preceding “chief magistrate” near the end of the first sentence.

47-25-85.
Members not prevented from belonging to another retirement system.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed so as to prevent any person who is a member of the fund from belonging to any other retirement, annuity, or benefit system.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-85

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 246, § 1/SB 244.

47-25-86.
Suspension of benefits if retired member becomes employed as a chief magistrate.

If a retired member becomes employed as a chief magistrate, his or her retirement benefits shall be suspended during the period of time he or she holds such position, and upon cessation of such service, his or her prior retirement allowance shall be resumed.

If a retired member becomes employed as a chief magistrate, he or she may elect again to become a contributing member of the retirement system and be governed by the retirement provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-86

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 246, § 1/SB 244; Ga. L. 2014, p. 835, § 9/HB 646; Ga. L. 2018, p. 196, § 3/HB 571.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, deleted “full-time” preceding “chief magistrate” near the beginning of subsection (b).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, deleted “full-time or part-time magistrate or” following “employed as a” near the middle of subsection (a).